Utah statutes.
7-9-45.   Insurance of shares and deposits -- Security on shares and
deposits.
(1) Except as provided in Subsection (2), a credit union subject to the
jurisdiction of the department shall obtain and maintain insurance on shares
and deposits from the National Credit Union Administration or successor
federal deposit insurance agency.
(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection 7-1-704(7)(a)(v) and Subsection (1), a credit
union may not be required to obtain federal insurance on shares and deposits
if:
(a)  the commissioner approves the credit union's election not to obtain
federal insurance on shares and deposits;
(b)  as security for the shares and deposits, the credit union maintains
securities:
(i)  that are issued by or directly and unconditionally guaranteed by:
(A)  the United States; or
(B)  an agency of the United States;
(ii)  that are held in an account with a primary reporting dealer that is:
(A)  recognized by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York; and
(B)  independent of the credit union;
(iii)  that are held in accordance with Title 70A, Chapter 8, Uniform
Commercial Code - Investment Securities; and
(iv)  in which the department has an express and exclusive security interest;
and
(c)  the aggregate value of the securities described in Subsection (2)(b) is
at all times equal to or greater than 1.15 times the aggregate amount of the
shares and deposits of the credit union.
(3)  The commissioner may appoint the administrator of the National Credit
Union Administration as liquidating agent of an insured credit union.
(4)  Failure to comply with this section constitutes grounds for supervisory
action under Chapter 2 or 19.
